Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HOSPITALITY MINNESOTA EDUCATION FOUNDATION; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Commissioner of education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Hospitality Minnesota Education Foundation. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to the Hospitality Minnesota Education Foundation for the ProStart hospitality and tourism management program, a statewide initiative in high schools to address the critical workforce shortages in hospitality: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Grant money must be used by the recipient to provide students culinary and management education curriculum, tools, skills, professional development opportunities within the hospitality industry, and scholarships. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end